Maryland, session 2026, HB0616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–211.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0616*

HOUSE BILL 616
(a) (1) Except for a facility that is operated or is listed and certified by the First
Church of Christ Scientist, Boston, Massachusetts, the Commission has jurisdiction over
[hospital]:
(I) HOSPITAL services offered by or through all facilities; AND
(II) COSTS FOR A FACILITY ASSOCIATED WITH EMPLOYING OR
CONTRACTING WITH PHYSICIANS OR OTHER PROFESSIONAL PROVIDERS FOR WHICH
THE FACILITY DOES NOT RECEIVE CORRESPONDING OFFSETTING PROFESSIONAL
REVENUE.
(2) The jurisdiction of the Commission over any identified physician service
shall terminate for a facility on the request of the facility.
(3) The rate approved for an identified physician service may not exceed
the rate on June 30, 1985, adjusted by an appropriate index of inflation.
19–212.
The Commission shall:
(1) Require each facility to disclose publicly:
(i) Its financial position; and
(ii) As computed by methods that the Commission determines, the
verified total costs incurred and revenue generated by the facility in providing health
services;
(2) Review for reasonableness and certify the rates and revenue of each
facility;
(3) Keep informed as to whether a facility has enough resources to meet its
financial requirements BY TAKING INTO ACCOUNT ALL COSTS INCURRED OR
EXPENDITURES MADE BY THE FACILITY IN CONNECTION WITH THE OPERATION OF
THE FACILITY, INCLUDING COSTS TO EMPLOY OR CONTRACT WITH PHYSICIANS OR
OTHER PROFESSIONAL PROVIDERS FOR WHICH THE FACILITY DOES NOT RECEIVE
CORRESPONDING OFFSETTING PROFESSIONAL REVENUE;
(4) Concern itself with solutions if a facility does not have enough
resources;
(5) Assure each purchaser of health care facility services that:
(i) The total costs of all hospital services offered by or through a
facility are reasonable;

HOUSE BILL 616 3
(ii) The aggregate rates of the facility are related reasonably to the
aggregate costs of the facility; and
(iii) Rates are set equitably among all purchasers of services without
undue discrimination;
(6) Develop guidelines for the establishment of global budgets for each
facility under Maryland’s all–payer model contract, including guidelines to prevent
facilities from taking actions to meet a budget that the Commission determines would have
adverse consequences for recipients or purchasers of services;
(7) Receive confirmation from Commission staff that facility global budget
agreements, as they are developed, are consistent with the guidelines; and
(8) After review by the Commission for compliance with the guidelines,
post each executed global budget agreement on the Commission’s website.
19–219.
(a) The Commission may review the costs, and rates, quality, and efficiency of
facility services, and make any investigation that the Commission considers necessary to
assure each purchaser of health care facility services that:
(1) The total costs of all hospital services offered by or through a facility
are reasonable;
(2) The aggregate rates of the facility are related reasonably to the
aggregate costs of the facility; and
(3) Except as provided in § 19–214.2(l) of this subtitle, the rates are set
equitably among all purchasers or classes of purchasers without undue discrimination or
preference.
(b) (1) To carry out its powers under subsection (a) of this section, the
Commission [may]:
(I) MAY review and approve or disapprove the reasonableness of
any rate or amount of revenue that a facility sets or requests; AND
(II) SHALL TAKE INTO ACCOUNT ALL COSTS INCURRED OR
EXPENDITURES MADE BY THE FACILITY IN CONNECTION WITH THE OPERATION OF
THE FACILITY, INCLUDING COSTS TO EMPLOY OR CONTRACT WITH PHYSICIANS OR
OTHER PROFESSIONAL PROVIDERS FOR WHICH THE FACILITY DOES NOT RECEIVE
CORRESPONDING OFFSETTING PROFESSIONAL REVENUE.

HOUSE BILL 616
(2) A facility shall:
(i) Charge for services only at a rate set in accordance with this
subtitle; and
(ii) Comply with the applicable terms and conditions of the all–payer
model contract.
(3) Consistent with the all–payer model contract, in determining the
reasonableness of rates, the Commission may take into account objective standards of
efficiency and effectiveness.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.